Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Records

§ 17-16-1601.
Corporate records.

A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its shareholders and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee of the board of directors in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation.

A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A record of shareholders administered by or on behalf of a corporation shall be kept in a form that permits preparation of a list of the identities of all shareholders, in alphabetical or numerical order by class of shares showing the number and class of shares held by each. The list shall also show each shareholder’s physical mailing address, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s name, and each shareholder’s authorized means of receipt for electronic transmissions, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s data address. A record of shareholders may show both the shareholder’s name and data address.

Records administered by or on behalf of, or maintained by, a corporation may be kept on, or by means of, or be in the form of any information storage device or method or any one (1) or more distributed or other electronic networks or databases provided that the records are kept in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

A corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

Its articles or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Resolutions adopted by its board of directors creating one (1) or more classes or series of shares, and fixing their relative rights, preferences and limitations, if shares issued pursuant to those resolutions are outstanding;

The minutes of all shareholders’ meetings, and records of all action taken by shareholders without a meeting, for the past three (3) years;

All written communications to shareholders generally within the past three (3) years, including the financial statements furnished for the past three (3) years under W.S.

17-16-1620

;

A list of the names and business addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Its most recent annual report delivered to the secretary of state under W.S.

17-16-1630

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2018 ch. 47, § 1, effective March 10, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (c), substituted “list of the identities of all” for “list of the names and addresses of all,” inserted “or numerical” following “alphabetical” in the first sentence, and added the second and third sentences; in (d), added “Records administered by or on behalf of, or maintained by, a” at the beginning and substituted “may be kept on, or by means of, or be in the form of any information storage device or method or any one (1) or more distributed or other electronic networks or databases provided that the” for “corporation shall maintain its records in written”; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2018, ch. 47, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2018.

§ 17-16-1602.
Inspection of records by shareholders.

A shareholder of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation’s principal office, any of the records of the corporation described in W.S. 17-16-1601(e) if the shareholder gives the corporation written notice of the shareholder’s demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy.

A shareholder who has been of record for at least six (6) months immediately preceding his demand and who shall be the holder of record of at least five percent (5%) of all the outstanding shares of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the shareholder meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and gives the corporation written notice of the shareholder’s demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which the shareholder wishes to inspect and copy:

Excerpts from minutes of any meeting of the board of directors, records of any action of a committee of the board of directors while acting in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation, minutes of any meeting of the shareholders, and records of action taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, to the extent not subject to inspection under W.S. 17-16-1602(a);

Accounting records of the corporation; and

The record of shareholders.

A shareholder may inspect and copy the records described in subsection (b) of this section only if:

The shareholder’s demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

The shareholder describes with reasonable particularity his purpose and the records he desires to inspect; and

The records are directly connected with the shareholder’s purpose.

The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited, but may be expanded, by a corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

This section does not affect:

The right of a shareholder to inspect records under W.S.

17-16-720

or, if the shareholder is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

The power of a court, independently of this act, to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

For purposes of this section, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on his behalf.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “the shareholder” or variant for “he” or variant in (a) through (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Bylaw extended right of inspection. —

Where bylaws of corporation provided that books and papers in custody of secretary and treasurer should be open at all times during business hours to inspection by stockholders, such bylaws were effective to extend stockholders' common-law right to examination of the corporation's books, without any allegation or proof of fraud or mismanagement on part of the officers. Wyoming Coal Mining Co. v. State ex rel Kennedy, 15 Wyo. 97, 87 P. 337,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 97, 87 P. 984,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1906) (decided under prior law).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Stockholder's right to inspect books and records of corporation, 22 ALR 24; 43 ALR 783; 59 ALR 1373; 80 ALR 1502; 174 ALR 262; 15 ALR2d 11.

Inspection of books and records of corporation by personal representatives of deceased stockholder or by trustee of stockholder, 15 ALR2d 11.

Purposes for which officer may exercise right to examine corporate books and records, 15 ALR2d 11.

Who has possession, custody or control of corporate books or records for purposes of order to produce, 47 ALR3d 676.

Right of member, officer, agent or director of private corporation or unincorporated association to assert personal privilege against self-incrimination with respect to production of corporate books or records, 52 ALR3d 636.

What corporate documents are subject to shareholder's right to inspection, 88 ALR3d 663.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection or use of membership list, 37 ALR4th 1206.

Spouse's right to discovery of closely held corporation records during divorce proceeding, 38 ALR4th 145.

Liability of independent accountant to investors or shareholders, 48 ALR5th 389.

§ 17-16-1603.
Scope of inspection right.

A shareholder’s agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder he represents.

The right to copy records under W.S.

17-16-1602

includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies by xerographic or other means, including copies through an electronic transmission if available and so requested by the shareholder.

The corporation may comply with a shareholder’s demand to inspect the record of shareholders under W.S. 17-16-1602(b)(iii) by providing the shareholder with a list of its shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the shareholder’s demand.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the shareholder. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production, reproduction or transmission of the records.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “by xerographic or other means, including copies through an electronic transmission if available and so requested by the shareholder” for “made by photographic, xerographic, or other means” in (b); substituted “the shareholder” for “him” in (c); added “or transmission” in (d); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1604.
Court ordered inspection.

If a corporation does not allow a shareholder who complies with W.S. 17-16-1602(a) to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the district court of the county where the corporation’s principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation’s expense upon application of the shareholder.

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a shareholder to inspect and copy any other record, the shareholder who complies with W.S. 17-16-1602(b) and (c) may apply to the district court in the county where the corporation’s principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s expenses, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding shareholder.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “expenses” for “costs” in (c).

§ 17-16-1605.
Inspection of records by directors.

A director of a corporation is entitled to inspect and copy the books, records and documents of the corporation at any reasonable time to the extent reasonably related to the performance of the director’s duties as a director, including duties as a member of a committee, but not for any other purpose or in any manner that would violate any duty to the corporation.

The district court of the county where the corporation’s principal office, or if none in this state, its registered office, is located may order inspection and copying of the books, records and documents at the corporation’s expense, upon application of a director who has been refused inspection rights, unless the corporation establishes that the director is not entitled to those inspection rights. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If an order is issued, the court may include provisions protecting the corporation from undue burden or expense, and prohibiting the director from using information obtained upon exercise of the inspection rights in a manner that would violate a duty to the corporation, and may also order the corporation to reimburse the director for the director’s expenses, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred in connection with the application unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the director to inspect the records demanded.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 17-16-1606.
Exception to notice requirement.

Whenever notice is required to be given under any provision of this act to any shareholder, the notice shall not be required to be given if:

Notice of two (2) consecutive annual meetings, and all notices of meetings during the period between the two (2) consecutive annual meetings, have been sent to the shareholder at the shareholder’s address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable; or

All, but not less than two (2), payments of dividends on securities during a twelve (12) month period, or two (2) consecutive payments of dividends on securities during a period of more than twelve (12) months, have been sent to the shareholder at the shareholder’s address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable.

If any shareholder shall deliver to the corporation a written notice setting forth the shareholder’s then current address, the requirement that notice be given to the shareholder shall be reinstated.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.